Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 2. Provisions Relating to Compact

§ 1971.
Administrator.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall be the “administrative head of the state police department” for the purposes of the New England State Police Compact set forth in subchapter 1 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 288

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 15, 1968.

§ 1972.
Alternate representative.

The Commissioner of Public Safety may designate an alternate to serve in his or her place and stead on the New England State Police Administrators’ Conference as permitted by article III(b) and (c) of the New England State Police Compact; however, it is the intention of the General Assembly that the Commissioner shall attend and participate in the work of the Conference in person to the maximum extent practicable.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 288

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 15, 1968.